Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4358.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 3c. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and notwithstanding any charter provision to the contrary, all terms of city officers elected after December 31, 2024 must not commence earlier than at 12 noon on the first day of the month following the officers election. If a citys charter provides for terms of city officers to commence after an election and before the first day of the month following the officers election, all terms of city officers elected in that city after December 31, 2024 commence at 12 noon on the first day of the month following the officers election. (2) Notwithstanding any charter provision to the contrary, an individual elected to fill a vacancy shall not take the oath of office until the results have been certified by the appropriate board of canvassers. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor